Washington statutes.
RCW 7.48.040

Stay of issuance of warrant.

At any time before the order is made or the warrant issues, the defendant may, on motion to the court or judge thereof, have an order to stay the issue of such warrant for such period as may be necessary, not exceeding six months, to allow the defendant to abate the nuisance himself or herself, upon his or her giving bond to the plaintiff in a sufficient amount with one or more sureties, to the satisfaction of the court or judge thereof, that he or she will abate it within the time and in the manner specified in such order. The sureties shall justify as provided by law. If the defendant fails to abate such nuisance within the time specified, the warrant for the abatement of the nuisance may issue as if the same had not been stayed.

[ 2011 c 336 s 211; 1957 c 51 s 11; Code 1881 s 608; 1877 p 127 s 613; 1869 p 145 s 562; RRS s 946.]

NOTES:

Corporate surety—Insurance: Chapter 48.28 RCW.